Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 3. LEGISLATIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE B. LEGISLATION

CHAPTER 320. UNFUNDED MANDATES ON POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS

Sec. 320.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "mandate" means a requirement made by a statute enacted by the legislature on or after January 1, 1997, that requires a political subdivision to establish, expand, or modify an activity in a way that requires the expenditure of revenue by the political subdivision that would not have been required in the absence of the statutory provision.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 673, Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 785, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.